Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish a user safety guide for water recreation facilities. The user safety guide shall be publicly available on the department's website.(2) For purposes of this section, "water recreation facility" means the same as in RCW 70.90.110.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.37 RCW to read as follows:(1) A local authority that issues business licenses for short-term rentals shall publish the user safety guide for water recreation facilities established in section 1 of this act on the local authority's website.(2) A short-term rental that has a water recreation facility shall have the user safety guide for water recreation facilities established in section 1 of this act posted in a prominent place near the water recreation facility.(3) For purposes of this section, "water recreation facility" means the same as in RCW 70.90.110.--- END ---